Utah statutes.
63I-2-236.   Repeal dates -- Title 36.

(1)  Section 36-12-15.1 is repealed July 1, 2015.

(2)  Sections 36-16a-101 through 36-16a-108 are repealed January 1, 2013.



Amended by Chapter 283, 2013 General Session

